South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3211.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 1, Title 40 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 40-1-35. A person who has a current and valid employment authorization approved by federal immigration authorities shall be eligible for occupational or professional licensure under the provisions of this title provided all other applicable requirements are met. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----